Utah statutes.
17B-2a-515.   Distribution of water when supply is inadequate.
If an irrigation district's water supply is not sufficient to supply all the
needs within the district, the board of trustees may distribute water as the
board considers best for all concerned, subject to distribution and
apportionment requirements of a district contract with the United States and
applicable federal law, rule, and regulation.
